Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2365
Revenue-Sharing Trust Fund; created; investment; expenditure.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the Revenue-Sharing Trust Fund to which shall be credited all funds received by the state under the federal State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, Public Law 92-512, or act successor thereto and to which shall be credited all earnings from the investment thereof. No expenditure shall be made from such fund except upon specific appropriation by the Legislature. Any such appropriation shall in all respects comply with the terms of the law and rules and regulations pursuant to which the federal government disburses such funds to the state. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1973, LB 122, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 87.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.